Hawaii statutes.
§501-154 Writ of possession, service, time
limit for registration. [Repeal and reenactment on June 30, 2020. L
2015, c 101, §4.] When in any action in the nature of an
action of ejectment an execution or writ of possession has been issued and
served by the sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, or independent civil
process server from the department of public safety's list under section 353C-10,
the sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, or independent civil process
server shall cause a copy of the writ, with a return of the doings of the sheriff,
deputy sheriff, police officer, or independent civil process server thereon, to
be filed and registered within three months after the service and before the
return of the writ into the clerk's office. The plaintiff, in case the
judgment was that the plaintiff was entitled to an estate in fee simple in the
demanded premises, or in any part thereof, and for which execution or writ of
possession issued, is thereupon entitled to the entry of a new certificate of
title. [L 1903, c 56, §83; RL 1925, §3272; RL 1935, §5081; RL 1945, §12681; RL
1955, §342-81; HRS §501-154; am L 1972, c 91, §1(dd); gen ch 1985; am L 2013, c
116, §§2, 25(1)]

Case Notes

Ejectment as remedy for removal of unregistered sewer line.
35 H. 225, 230; 50 H. 189, 436 P.2d 207.

Necessity of describing the area unlawfully occupied, see 35
H. 225, 228.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next